District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.10

Consumer protection.

The Central Collection Unit and any outside parties it engages to collect delinquent debt shall fully comply with the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act, approved September 20, 1977 (91 Stat. 874; 15 U.S.C. § 1692 et seq.), Chapter 39 of Title 28 [§ 28-3901 et seq.], and all other federal and District laws and rules that govern collection of delinquent debt.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1051, 59 DCR 8025